apertium-fkv-fin.fkv.twol
Alphabet

 A B C D Đ E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Ä Ö Å

 a b c d đ e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ä ö å

 %{A%}:ä %{A%}:a  %{U%}:y %{U%}:u

 %>:0 ;

Sets

Vow = A E I O U Ä Ö Å
      a e i o u ä ö å ;

Back = A O U
       a o u ;

Front = Ä Ö Y
        ä ö y ;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Both-arrow rule for {A}"
%{A%}:a <=> Back \Front* _ ;

"Both-arrow rule for {U}"
%{U%}:u <=> Back \Front* _ ;
